Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article VIII. Education.

§ 1. Public schools of high quality to be maintained.

The General Assembly shall provide for a system of free public elementary and secondary schools for all children of school age throughout the Commonwealth, and shall seek to ensure that an educational program of high quality is established and continually maintained.

Cross references.

As to disposition of fines in criminal cases, see §

19.2-340.1

.

For statutory provisions relating to public free schools, see Title 22.1, generally, and § 22.1-253.13:1 A.

Law Review.

For note on school cases in the Supreme Court, particularly Harrison v. Day,

200 Va. 439

, 106 S.E.2d 636 (1959).

see 45 Va. L. Rev. 1410 (1959).

For article, “In Aid of Public Education: An Analysis of the Education Article of the Virginia Constitution of 1971,” see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 263 (1971).

For discussion of the role of state constitutions in education, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 916 (1976).

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

For an article, “The Supreme Court and Public Schools,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1335 (2000).

For note, “Shuffling the Deck: Redistricting to Promote a Quality Education in Virginia,”
Va. L. Rev. 773 (2003).

For note, “The Right to Education in Juvenile Detention Under State Constitutions,” see 94 Va. L. Rev. 765 (2008).

For article, “State Constitutions and Individual Rights: Conceptual Convergence in School Finance Legislation,” see 18 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 301 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
2A M.J. Attorney & Client, §§ 2, 55;
3B M.J. Civil Rights, § 6;
4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 25;
16 M.J. Schools, §§ 3, 4, 13.

§ 2. Standards of quality; State and local support of public schools.

Standards of quality for the several school divisions shall be determined and prescribed from time to time by the Board of Education, subject to revision only by the General Assembly.

The General Assembly shall determine the manner in which funds are to be provided for the cost of maintaining an educational program meeting the prescribed standards of quality, and shall provide for the apportionment of the cost of such program between the Commonwealth and the local units of government comprising such school divisions. Each unit of local government shall provide its portion of such cost by local taxes or from other available funds.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions relating to local school taxes, see §§ 22.1-88, 22.1-95, and 22.1-102 through 22.1-106.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 123 and 730, provide: “§ 1. A. Pursuant to § 9401 of the federal No Child Left Behind Act (NCLB), Public Law 107-110, the Board of Education shall continue to seek waivers from compliance with those provisions of NCLB that are fiscally and programmatically burdensome to school divisions and are not instructionally sound or in the best interest of children.

“The Board shall report on the status of its waivers from compliance to the chairmen of the Senate Education and Health Committee and the House Education Committee no later than October 1, 2007. Such report shall contain a summary of the waivers requested from the United States Department of Education during the calendar year 2007, a summary of the responses from the United States Department of Education, and a timeline providing the submission date of every waiver request and the date that a response was provided.

“B. In the event that any or all waiver requests are not approved by the United States Department of Education, the Board shall transmit a summary of all requests not approved to the Virginia Congressional delegation for its consideration in the reauthorization of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act. Such report or reports shall be submitted in a manner prescribed by the Board.

“If the reauthorization of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act does not provide the necessary revisions in the federal law to grant states and localities the flexibilities requested in Virginia’s waiver requests, the Board shall make a recommendation to the General Assembly on Virginia’s continued implementation of NCLB.

“C. The Board of Education and Office of the Attorney General of Virginia may bring suit against the United States Department of Education if, as a result of the Commonwealth’s withdrawal from the voluntary NCLB, funds that are not directly related to NCLB and that help children from low-income families meet challenging academic content and achievement standards are withheld.”

Acts 2008, cc. 826 and 831, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Unless reauthorization of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act provides the necessary revisions in the No Child Left Behind (NCLB) Act that allow Virginia’s existing educational accountability system, as set forth in the Standards of Quality, Standards of Learning, and Standards of Accreditation, to substantially meet the accountability requirements of the federal law, the Board of Education shall make a recommendation to the General Assembly on whether Virginia should withdraw from NCLB. Should the Board recommend withdrawing from participation in NCLB, the Board shall develop a plan for withdrawal and shall submit such plan to the Governor and the General Assembly for their consideration by June 30, 2009.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on taxation for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1618 (1971).

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

For note, “Shuffling the Deck: Redistricting to Promote a Quality Education in Virginia,”
Va. L. Rev. 773 (2003).

For article, “State Constitutions and Individual Rights: Conceptual Convergence in School Finance Legislation,” see 18 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 301 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
16 M.J. Schools, §§ 25, 27, 29;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 7.

§ 3. Compulsory education; free textbooks.

The General Assembly shall provide for the compulsory elementary and secondary education of every eligible child of appropriate age, such eligibility and age to be determined by law. It shall ensure that textbooks are provided at no cost to each child attending public school whose parent or guardian is financially unable to furnish them.

Cross references.

As to textbooks, see § 22.1-238 et seq.

As to compulsory attendance, see § 22.1-254 et seq.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

For article, “State Constitutions and Individual Rights: Conceptual Convergence in School Finance Legislation,” see 18 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 301 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Selection of textbooks. —

A local school board may select and use textbooks that are not approved by the Board of Education, provided it complies with the Board’s regulations governing such selection. Further, a local school board must give “official approval” of criteria to be used for review and assessment of textbooks at the local level. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 09-022, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (7/27/09).

§ 4. Board of Education.

The general supervision of the public school system shall be vested in a Board of Education of nine members, to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Each appointment shall be for four years, except that those to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired terms. Terms shall be staggered, so that no more than three regular appointments shall be made in the same year.

Cross references.

As to Board of Education, see § 22.1-8 et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
16 M.J. Sheriffs, § 2.

§ 5. Powers and duties of the Board of Education.

The powers and duties of the Board of Education shall be as follows:

Subject to such criteria and conditions as the General Assembly may prescribe, the Board shall divide the Commonwealth into school divisions of such geographical area and school-age population as will promote the realization of the prescribed standards of quality, and shall periodically review the adequacy of existing school divisions for this purpose.

It shall make annual reports to the Governor and the General Assembly concerning the condition and needs of public education in the Commonwealth, and shall in such report identify any school divisions which have failed to establish and maintain schools meeting the prescribed standards of quality.

It shall certify to the school board of each division a list of qualified persons for the office of division superintendent of schools, one of whom shall be selected to fill the post by the division school board. In the event a division school board fails to select a division superintendent within the time prescribed by law, the Board of Education shall appoint him.

It shall have authority to approve textbooks and instructional aids and materials for use in courses in the public schools of the Commonwealth.

Subject to the ultimate authority of the General Assembly, the Board shall have primary responsibility and authority for effectuating the educational policy set forth in this Article, and it shall have such other powers and duties as may be prescribed by law.

Cross references.

As to Board of Education generally, see § 22.1-8 et seq.

As to power of Board to divide State into school divisions and appoint superintendents of such divisions, see § 22.1-25 et seq. and § 22.1-58 et seq.

As to regulation of textbooks by Board, see § 22.1-238 et seq.

Proposed amendment not agreed to by General Assembly. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2015 Regular Session (Acts 2015, c. 719) and was referred to the 2016 Regular Session. At the 2016 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Law Review.

For an article, “The Supreme Court and Public Schools,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1335 (2000).

For note, “Shuffling the Deck: Redistricting to Promote a Quality Education in Virginia,”
Va. L. Rev. 773 (2003).

§ 6. Superintendent of Public Instruction.

A Superintendent of Public Instruction, who shall be an experienced educator, shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, for a term coincident with that of the Governor making the appointment, but the General Assembly may alter by statute this method of selection and term of office. The powers and duties of the Superintendent shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references.

As to Superintendent of Public Instruction, see § 22.1-21 et seq.

§ 7. School boards.

The supervision of schools in each school division shall be vested in a school board, to be composed of members selected in the manner, for the term, possessing the qualifications, and to the number provided by law.

Cross references.

As to county school boards generally, see § 22.1-34 et seq.

As to county boards in counties having county manager or county board form of government, see § 22.1-47.1 et seq.

As to boards of cities and towns, see § 22.1-48 et seq.

As to boards of school divisions composed of less than one county or city or part or all of more than one county or city, see § 22.1-52 et seq.

As to appointment, qualifications and duties of division superintendents, see § 22.1-58 et seq.

Proposed amendments not agreed to by General Assembly. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1995 Regular Session (Acts 1995, c. 711) and was referred to the 1996 Session. At the 1996 Session of the General Assembly, the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1989 Session (Acts 1989, c. 669), and referred to the 1990 Session. At the 1990 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations in the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1301 (1972).

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

For annual survey article, “Education Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 5.1;
16 M.J. Schools, §§ 4, 8, 13.

§ 8. The Literary Fund.

The General Assembly shall set apart as a permanent and perpetual school fund the present Literary Fund; the proceeds of all public lands donated by Congress for free public school purposes, of all escheated property, of all waste and unappropriated lands, of all property accruing to the Commonwealth by forfeiture except as hereinafter provided, of all fines collected for offenses committed against the Commonwealth, and of the annual interest on the Literary Fund; and such other sums as the General Assembly may appropriate. But so long as the principal of the Fund totals as much as eighty million dollars, the General Assembly may set aside all or any part of additional moneys received into its principal for public school purposes, including the teachers retirement fund.

The General Assembly may provide by general law an exemption from this section for the proceeds from the sale of all property seized and forfeited to the Commonwealth for a violation of the criminal laws of this Commonwealth proscribing the manufacture, sale or distribution of a controlled substance or marijuana. Such proceeds shall be paid into the state treasury and shall be distributed by law for the purpose of promoting law enforcement.

The Literary Fund shall be held and administered by the Board of Education in such manner as may be provided by law. The General Assembly may authorize the Board to borrow other funds against assets of the Literary Fund as collateral, such borrowing not to involve the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth.

The principal of the Fund shall include assets of the Fund in other funds or authorities which are repayable to the Fund.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions relating to the Literary Fund, see § 22.1-142 et seq. As to payments into Literary Fund by Virginia Public School Authority, see § 22.1-170.

As to semiannual transfer of excess funds from Literary Fund to Virginia Public School Authority, see § 22.1-175.

Amendment ratified Nov. 6, 1990. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1989 Session (Acts 1989, cc. 672 and 674), and referred to the 1990 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1990, cc. 611, 621, 883, and 885) and submitted to the people Nov. 6, 1990, when it was ratified. The amendments inserted “except as hereinafter provided” following “accruing to the Commonwealth by forfeiture” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, and inserted the present second paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on constitutional law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1197 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 93;
16 M.J. Schools, §§ 6, 28.

§ 9. Other educational institutions.

The General Assembly may provide for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of any educational institutions which are desirable for the intellectual, cultural, and occupational development of the people of this Commonwealth. The governance of such institutions, and the status and powers of their boards of visitors or other governing bodies, shall be as provided by law.

Cross references.

As to certain prohibited conduct by state and local government officers and employees having a personal interest in a transaction, see §

2.2-3112

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3C M.J. Clerks of Court, § 2.

§ 10. State appropriations prohibited to schools or institutions of learning not owned or exclusively controlled by the State or some subdivision thereof; exceptions to rule.

No appropriation of public funds shall be made to any school or institution of learning not owned or exclusively controlled by the State or some political subdivision thereof; provided, first, that the General Assembly may, and the governing bodies of the several counties, cities and towns may, subject to such limitations as may be imposed by the General Assembly, appropriate funds for educational purposes which may be expended in furtherance of elementary, secondary, collegiate or graduate education of Virginia students in public and nonsectarian private schools and institutions of learning, in addition to those owned or exclusively controlled by the State or any such county, city or town; second, that the General Assembly may appropriate funds to an agency, or to a school or institution of learning owned or controlled by an agency, created and established by two or more States under a joint agreement to which this State is a party for the purpose of providing educational facilities for the citizens of the several States joining in such agreement; third, that counties, cities, towns and districts may make appropriations to nonsectarian schools of manual, industrial or technical training and also to any school or institution of learning owned or exclusively controlled by such county, city, town or school district.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia developments in constitutional law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1677 (1975).

For note on enforcing separation of church and state through state constitutional provisions, see 71 Va. L. Rev. 625 (1985).

For article, “State Aid to Religious-Affiliated Schools: A Political Analysis,” see 28 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 119 (1986).

For several articles on religion and the state, see 27 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 833 — 1109 (1987).

§ 11. Aid to nonpublic higher education.

The General Assembly may provide for loans to, and grants to or on behalf of, students attending nonprofit institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth whose primary purpose is to provide collegiate or graduate education and not to provide religious training or theological education. The General Assembly may also provide for a State agency or authority to assist in borrowing money for construction of educational facilities at such institutions, provided that the Commonwealth shall not be liable for any debt created by such borrowing. The General Assembly may also provide for the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof to contract with such institutions for the provision of educational or other related services.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified November 5, 1974. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1973 Session (Acts 1973, c. 549) and referred to the 1974 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1974, cc. 624, 687) and submitted to the people Nov. 5, 1974, when it was ratified. The amendment inserted “and grants to or on behalf of” following “loans to” near the beginning of the first sentence and added the last sentence of the section.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia developments in constitutional law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1677 (1975).

For article, “State Courts and Constitutional Rights in the Day of the Burger Court,” see 62 Va. L. Rev. 873 (1976).

For several articles on religion and the state, see 27 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 833 — 1109 (1987).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
3C M.J. Colleges & Universities, § 7.